Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.

§ 51-9-101.
Citation of article.

This article may be cited as the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-51; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-103.
Legislative determination and declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the waterways and surface waters of the state are among its basic resources, that the overflow and surface waters of the state have not heretofore been conserved to realize their full beneficial use, that the preservation, conservation, storage, and control of such waters are necessary to insure an adequate, sanitary water supply at all times, to promote the balanced economic development of the state, and to aid in flood control, conservation and development of state forests, irrigation of lands needing irrigation, and pollution abatement. It is further determined and declared that the preservation, conservation, storage, and control of the waters of the Pearl River and its tributaries and its overflow waters for domestic, municipal, commercial, industrial, agricultural, and manufacturing purposes, for recreational uses, for flood control, timber development, irrigation, and pollution abatement are, as a matter of public policy, for the general welfare of the entire people of the state.

The creation of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District is determined to be necessary and essential to the accomplishment of the aforesaid purposes, and this article operates on a subject in which the state at large is interested. All the terms and provisions of this article are to be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes herein set forth, this being a remedial law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-52; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-105.
General authority to organize.

The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District may hereafter be organized in this state under the provisions of this article, in the manner hereinafter provided. This water supply district shall be an agency of the state and a body politic and corporate, and may be composed of one or more entire counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-53; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-107.
Board of directors.

All powers of the district shall be exercised by a board of directors, to be composed of the following:

Each member of the Pearl River Industrial Commission whose county becomes a part of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District shall be a member of the Board of Directors of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District. Such directors shall serve on this board during their term of office on the Pearl River Industrial Commission. In addition, the board of supervisors of each county that becomes a part of the district shall appoint one (1) additional member, who shall serve for a term concurrent with the terms of the members of the board of supervisors. The members shall be appointed at the first meeting of the board of supervisors in January after the supervisors take office. The members appointed from Madison County and Rankin County shall be persons who reside on and are holders of residential leases from the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District that are located in Madison County and Rankin County, respectively, or who reside in established subdivisions in Madison County and Rankin County, respectively, in which some of the residential property of the subdivision is leased from the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.

The members appointed from Madison County and Rankin County who are serving on July 1, 2012, shall continue to serve until January 1, 2013, after which date the Board of Supervisors of Madison County and the Board of Supervisors of Rankin County each shall appoint one (1) member who meets the residency requirements of this section. The persons appointed under the provisions of this paragraph shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality, the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, Forestry Commission and the State Board of Health of the State of Mississippi shall each appoint one (1) director from that department to serve on the Board of Directors of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District to serve at the pleasure of the respective board appointing him. From and after January 1, 2013, each of the members appointed under this paragraph (b) shall be a person who resides on and is a holder of a residential lease from the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.

Each director shall take and subscribe to the oath of office required by Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi before a chancery clerk, that he will faithfully discharge the duties of the office, which oath shall be filed with the clerk and by him preserved.

Each director shall receive per diem compensation in the amount as provided in Section 25-3-69 for attending each meeting of the board and for each day spent in attending to the necessary business of the district and shall be reimbursed for actual expenses thus incurred upon express authorization of the board, including travel expenses, as provided in Section 25-3-41.

The board of directors shall annually elect from its number a president and a vice president of the district, and such other officers as in the judgment of the board are necessary. The president shall be the chief executive officer of the district and the presiding officer of the board, and shall have the same right to vote as any other director. The vice president shall perform all duties and exercise all powers conferred by this article upon the president when the president is absent or fails or declines to act, except the president’s right to vote. The board shall also appoint a secretary and a treasurer who may or may not be members of the board, and it may combine those offices. The treasurer shall give bond in the sum of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) as set by the board of directors and each director shall give bond in the sum of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), and the premiums on those bonds shall be an expense of the district. The condition of each such bond shall be that the treasurer or director will faithfully perform all duties of office and account for all money which shall come into his custody as treasurer or director of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-54; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 90; Laws, 2012, ch. 549, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 51-9-109.
Petition for creation of district.

The Pearl River Industrial Commission, acting through it members who favor bringing the counties they represent into the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, shall petition the chancery court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County to organize and establish the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District and shall set forth in the petition:

The counties to be included in the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District. Any county through which the Pearl River runs or which borders on the Pearl River may be included in the district.

The fact that a preliminary report or study to determine the engineering feasibility of constructing a dam and reservoir in the basin of Pearl River has been made by a competent engineer or engineering firm and that such study or report shows that the construction of such facilities is feasible for water conservation or supply or for any of the other purposes or services contemplated by the legislative declaration of public policy in this article.

The necessity and desirability for the construction of such facilities.

A general description of the purposes of the contemplated works, and a general description of the plan including the lands to be overflowed or otherwise affected thereby, and maps or plats showing the general location of the reservoir and dam and related facilities. The word “project” when used herein shall mean the general plan and purposes of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, including its physical properties, as set out in this petition to the chancery court; and the words “project area” shall mean the physical location of the reservoir, dam, and related facilities as shown on the plats filed with the chancery court and shall include and be limited to an area of one mile from the shore line of the reservoir at high water. The words “related facilities” as used in this article shall mean the facilities indicated on said maps or plats filed with the chancery court or otherwise explained in the pleadings filed with the chancery court and shall include property, land, or areas of land adjacent to, or in the vicinity of, said reservoir or dam and within a distance of one mile from the high water mark of the proposed shore line of said reservoir as shown on said map, which may be acquired, owned, rented, leased, or sold by the district in connection with the recreational or industrial development and use of the project.

The petition shall be filed with as many copies as there are parties defendant. A copy of the preliminary report or study shall be attached to the original and each copy of the petition as an exhibit.

The board of water commissioners shall be made a party defendant, and the chancery clerk shall furnish the board of water commissioners with a copy of the petition with attached exhibits. Each county named in the petition shall be joined as a party defendant by service of process on the president of the board of supervisors thereof, and the chancery clerk shall furnish a copy of the petition to each such president. Whenever any municipality having a population according to the most recent federal census of ten thousand (10,000) or more is included in such proposed district, such municipality shall be made a party defendant.

It shall not be necessary that any land owners in the counties to be included in said proposed district be named in the petition, or made parties defendant. The chancellor of the chancery court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, shall have jurisdiction of the entire water supply district and project area for the purposes of this article. Such jurisdiction may be exercised by the chancellor in term time or in vacation, as provided in this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-55; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-111.
Proceedings after petition filed.

The board of water commissioners shall make a written report on the preliminary study or plans furnished them and shall, within thirty days after receipt of the said study, file such report with the chancery court setting forth their recommendations concerning the proposed water supply district. After the filing of the report of the board of water commissioners, and upon motion of the petitioners, the chancellor shall enter an order fixing the date for a hearing of the cause on the original petition, the exhibit, the report and recommendations of the board of water commissioners, and any answers filed or other pleadings. The chancery clerk shall give notice of such hearing to all persons interested by posting notices thereof at the door of the courthouse of the county or counties in which the district is situated and in at least ten public places in said proposed district, and also by publishing said notice at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in Hinds County and in a newspaper published in each of the other counties proposed to be included in such water supply district. If there is no newspaper published in any such county, then it shall be sufficient to publish said notice in a newspaper having a general circulation in such county. Such notice shall be addressed to the property owners and qualified electors of such proposed district and all other persons interested, shall state when and in what court said petition was and is filed, shall state the counties included in such district, and shall command all such persons to appear before the chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, at the Chancery Court Building in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, upon the date fixed by the chancellor to show cause, if any they can, why the proposed water supply district should not be organized and established as prayed for in said petition. The date of such hearing shall not be less than twenty-one days nor more than forty days after the last publication of such notice. It shall be sufficient in describing the lands to be included in the water supply district to name the counties to be included therein in the publication or notice hereinbefore mentioned.

If the court or chancellor finds that the notice or publication was not given as provided for in this article, it shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, but the court or chancellor shall order due publication or notice to be given and shall continue the hearing until such publication or notice shall be properly given, and the court or chancellor shall thereupon proceed as though publication or notice had been properly given in the first instance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-56; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-113.
Hearing.

The chancery court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County may hear the petition at any term thereof, or the chancellor of said court may fix a time to hear such petition at any time in vacation, and may determine all matters pertaining thereto, may adjourn the hearing from time to time, and may continue the case for want of sufficient notice or other good cause. If said petition shall prove defective in any manner, the petitioners, upon motion, shall be permitted to amend the same.

Upon the day set for hearing said petition, or a day to which same may be continued by the court or chancellor, all parties interested may appear and contest the same. If upon the hearing of such petition, it is found that such project is feasible from an engineering standpoint and practical, and if the creation of the water supply district under the terms of this article would meet a public necessity both local and statewide and would be conducive to the public welfare of the state as a whole, such court or chancellor shall so find and shall make and enter an order upon the minutes of the said chancery court stating that the said district to be known as the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, should be organized subject to all of the terms and provisions of this article.

If the chancellor finds that the proposed water supply district should not be organized, he shall dismiss the proceedings, and the costs shall be paid by the Pearl River Industrial Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4956-57, 5956-58; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, §§ 7, 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-115.
Order and notice of election.

If the court or chancellor thereof finds that the proposed water supply district should be organized, the chancellor shall then order an election in each county in the proposed district, which election shall be held not less than twenty-one nor more than forty-five days from the date of such order, whereby the qualified electors within such counties may determine if such county shall be a part of such proposed district; and such order for an election shall be interlocutory and not appealable. A substantial copy of the court order shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper published in each county in such district. If there is no newspaper published in any such county, then it shall be sufficient to publish said notice in a newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one days following the issuance of such order at three public places in such county. Notice of the election shall be given by publishing a substantial copy of the court order providing for the election once a week for at least three consecutive weeks, in at least one newspaper published in each county in which an election is to be held. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one days prior to the date fixed for such election. If no newspaper is published in any such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one days next preceding such election at three public places in such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-58; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-117.
Election.

Such election shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties. At such election, all qualified electors of such counties may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon the words “FOR BEING INCLUDED IN THE PEARL RIVER VALLEY WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT” and “AGAINST BEING INCLUDED IN THE PEARL RIVER VALLEY WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT”; and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition. In any particular county, should a majority of the qualified electors voting in such election in such county vote in favor of the creation of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, then that county shall become a part of the water supply district. The chancery court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, or the chancellor thereof in vacation, shall thereupon enter a final order including such county in the district. In any particular county, should a majority of the qualified electors voting in such election in such county vote against being included in the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, then that county shall not become a part of the water supply district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-59; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-119.
Appeals.

Any person interested in or aggrieved by the final order of the court or the chancellor, creating the water supply district or dismissing the petition or admitting a county to the district, and who was a party to the proceedings in the chancery court may prosecute an appeal therefrom within ten days from the date of such decree by furnishing an appeal bond in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00) with two good and sufficient sureties, conditioned to pay all costs of the appeal in the event the decree is affirmed. Such appeal bond shall be subject to the approval of the chancery clerk. When the transcript of the record of the case shall be filed in the office of the supreme court, the appellee having been summoned to appear and answer the appeal, ten days after service of the summons on appellee or his attorney the court shall consider such case as entitled to be heard. Any party to any proceeding in any court involving any of the provisions of this article may waive any time for filing pleadings so as to obtain an earlier hearing.

Any appeal from such order or decree of the chancery court or chancellor shall be a preference case in the supreme court and shall be tried at the earliest moment convenient with said court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-60; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-121.
Powers of district.

The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District through its board of directors is hereby empowered:

To impound overflow water and the surface water of the Pearl River or its tributaries within the project area, within or without this district at the place or places and in the amount as may be approved by the Office of Land and Water Resources of the State of Mississippi, by the construction of a dam or dams, reservoir or reservoirs, works, plants, and any other necessary or useful related facilities contemplated and described as a part of the project within or without the district, to control, store, and preserve these waters, and to use, distribute, and sell the same. The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District is also empowered to construct or otherwise acquire within the project area all works, plants, or other facilities necessary or useful to the project for the purpose of processing the water and transporting it to cities and others for domestic, municipal, commercial, industrial, agricultural, and manufacturing purposes and is hereby given the power to control open channels for water delivery purposes.

To acquire and develop any other available water necessary or useful to the project and to construct, acquire, and develop all facilities within the project area deemed necessary or useful with respect thereto.

To prevent or aid in the prevention of damage to person or property from the waters of the Pearl River or any of its tributaries.

To forest and reforest, and to aid in the foresting and reforesting of the project area, and to prevent and aid in the prevention of soil erosion and floods within this area; to control, store, and preserve within the boundaries of the project area the waters of the Pearl River or any of its tributaries, for irrigation of lands and for prevention of water pollution.

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or in any other manner (otherwise than by condemnation) and to maintain, use, and operate all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein within the project area, within or without the boundaries of the district, necessary for the project and convenient to the exercise of the powers, rights, privileges, and functions conferred upon the district by this article.

To acquire by condemnation all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein within the project area not exceeding one-quarter (1/4) mile from the outside line of the three hundred (300) feet above sea level contour on each side of Pearl River except as provided for rights-of-way under subsection (g) of this section, within or without the boundaries of the district, necessary for the project and the exercise of the powers, rights, privileges, and functions conferred upon the district by this article, according to the procedure provided by law for the condemnation of lands or other property taken for rights-of-way or other purposes by railroads, telephone, or telegraph companies. For the purposes of carrying out this article, the right of eminent domain of the district shall be superior and dominant to the right of eminent domain of railroad, telegraph, telephone, gas, power, and other companies or corporations, and shall be sufficient to enable the acquisition of county roads, state highways, or other public property in the project area and the acquisition, or relocation, of the above mentioned utility property in the project area; however, Mississippi Highway 43 as presently located shall be kept open as part of the state highway system. The cost of right-of-way purchases, rerouting, and elevating all other county maintained roads affected by construction of the reservoir shall be borne by the water district, and new construction shall be of equal quality as in roads existing as of May 5, 1958. The amount and character of interest in land, other property, and easements thus to be acquired shall be determined by the board of directors, and their determination shall be conclusive and shall not be subject to attack in the absence of manifold abuse of discretion or fraud on the part of such board in making such determination. However,

In acquiring lands, either by negotiation or condemnation, the district shall not acquire minerals or royalties within the project area; sand and gravel shall not be considered as minerals within the meaning of this section; and

No person or persons owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production shall be prevented from exploring, developing, or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipe lines, and other means of transporting these products by reason of the inclusion of such lands or mineral interests within the project area, whether below or above the water line; but any such activities shall be under such reasonable regulations by the board of directors as will adequately protect the reservoir; and

In drilling and developing, these persons are hereby vested with a special right to have the mineral interest integrated and their lands developed in such drilling unit or units as the State Oil and Gas Board shall establish after due consideration of the rights of all of the owners to be included in the drilling unit.

Moreover, where any site or plot of land is to be rented, leased, or sold to any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of operating recreational facilities thereon for profit, then the board shall, by resolution, specify the terms and conditions of the sale, rental, or lease, and shall advertise for public bids thereon. When bids are received, they shall be publicly opened by the board, and the board shall thereupon determine the highest and best bid submitted and shall immediately notify the former owner of the site or plot of the amount, terms, and conditions of the highest and best bid. The former owner of the site or plot shall have the exclusive right at his option, for a period of thirty (30) days after the determination of the highest and best bid by the board, to rent, lease, or purchase said site or plot of land by meeting such highest and best bid and by complying with all terms and conditions of the renting, leasing, or sale as specified by the board. However, the board shall not in any event rent, lease, or sell to any former owner more land than was taken from the former owner for the construction of the project, or one-quarter (1/4) mile of shoreline, whichever is the lesser. If this option is not exercised by the former owner within a period of thirty (30) days, then the board shall accept the highest and best bid submitted.

Any bona fide, resident householder, actually living or maintaining a residence on land taken by the district by condemnation shall have the right to repurchase not exceeding forty (40) acres of his former land or other available land from the board of directors for a price not exceeding the price paid for condemning his land.

To require the necessary relocation of roads and highways, railroad, telephone, and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and mains and facilities in the project area, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided due compensation is first paid the owners thereof or agreement is had with the owners regarding the payment of the cost of the relocation. It is further provided that the district is hereby authorized to acquire easements or rights-of-way in or outside of the project area for the relocation of the roads, highways, railroad, telephone, and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and mains and facilities, and to convey the same to the owners thereof in connection with the relocation as a part of the construction of the project; however, the directors of the district shall not close any public access road to the reservoir existing prior to the construction of the reservoir unless the board of supervisors of the county in which the road is located agrees.

To overflow and inundate any public lands and public property, including sixteenth section lands and in lieu lands, within the project area.

To construct, extend, improve, maintain, and reconstruct, to cause to be constructed, extended, improved, maintained, and reconstructed, and to use and operate facilities of any kind within the project area necessary or convenient to the project and to the exercise of such powers, rights, privileges, and functions.

To sue and be sued in its corporate name.

To adopt, use, and alter a corporate seal.

To make bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs.

To employ engineers, attorneys, and all necessary agents and employees to properly finance, construct, operate, and maintain the project and the plants and facilities of the district and carry out the provisions of this article, and to pay reasonable compensation for the services. For all services in connection with the issuance of bonds as provided in this article, the attorney’s fee shall not exceed one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) of the principal amount of said bonds. For any other services, only reasonable compensation shall be paid for these services. The board shall have the right to employ a general manager, who shall, at the discretion of the board, have the power to employ and discharge employees. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, it may employ fiscal agents or advisors in connection with its financing program and in connection with the issuance of its bonds.

To make contracts and to execute instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers, rights, privileges, and functions conferred upon it by this article.

To make or cause to be made surveys and engineering investigations relating to the project, or related projects, for the information of the district to facilitate the accomplishment of the purposes for which it is created.

To apply for and accept grants from the United States of America, or from any corporation or agency created or designated by the United States of America, and to ratify and accept applications heretofore or hereafter made by voluntary associations to these agencies for grants to construct, maintain, or operate any project or projects which hereafter may be undertaken or contemplated by the district.

To do any other acts or things necessary or convenient to the exercising of the powers, rights, privileges, or functions conferred upon it by this article or any other law.

To make contracts in the issuance of bonds that may be necessary to insure the marketability thereof.

To enter into contracts with municipalities, corporations, districts, public agencies, political subdivisions of any kind, and others for any services, facilities or commodities that the project may provide. The district is also authorized to contract with any municipality, corporation, or public agency for the rental, leasing, purchase, or operation of the water production, water filtration or purification, water supply and distributing facilities of the municipality, corporation, or public agency upon such consideration as the district and such entity may agree. Any such contract may be upon any terms and for any time as the parties may agree, and it may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein and refunding bonds issued in lieu of these bonds are paid. Any contract with any political subdivision shall be binding upon said political subdivision according to its terms, and any municipalities or other political subdivisions shall have the power to enter into such contracts as in the discretion of the governing authorities thereof would be to the best interest of the people of the municipality or other political subdivision. These contracts may include, within the discretion of the governing authorities, a pledge of the full faith and credit of the political subdivisions for the performance thereof.

To fix and collect charges and rates for any services, facilities, or commodities furnished by it in connection with the project, and to impose penalties for failure to pay these charges and rates when due.

To operate and maintain within the project area with the consent of the governing body of any city or town located within the district, any works, plants, or facilities of any city deemed necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of the purposes for which the district is created.

Subject to the provisions of this article, from time to time to lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of any property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein within the project area or acquired outside the project area as authorized in this article, for the purpose of furthering the business of the district.

When, in the opinion of the board of directors as shown by resolution duly passed, it shall not be necessary to the carrying on of the business of the district that the district own any lands acquired, then the board shall advertise these lands for sale to the highest and best bidder for cash and shall receive and publicly open the bids thereon. The board shall, by resolution, determine the highest and best bid submitted for such land and shall thereupon notify the former owner, his heirs or devisees, by registered mail of the land to be sold and the highest and best bid received therefor, and the former owner, or his heirs or devisees, shall have the exclusive right at his or their option for a period of thirty (30) days in which to meet the highest and best bid and to purchase the property.

In addition to, or in conjunction with, any other powers and duties of the district arising under this chapter, to exercise those powers, duties and functions of a joint water management district set forth in Sections 51-8-27 through 51-8-55, except the power of eminent domain under Section 51-8-33. Before exercising those powers and duties, the district must comply with the provisions of Sections 51-8-63 and 51-8-65. In exercising the functions of a joint water management district, the district may apply to the Environmental Quality Permit Board for delegation of those powers and duties as provided by Section 51-3-15, and to apply to the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality for delegation of those powers and duties provided by Section 51-3-21.

Any transaction regarding any property under the provisions of this section shall be executed in accordance with the provisions of Section 29-1-1.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-61; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 11; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 7; Laws, 1995, ch. 616, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 51-9-122.
Renewal of residential property leases in district.

At any time more than fifteen (15) years after the commencement date of any residential lease from the district, the leaseholder shall have the option to renew and extend the lease for a new sixty-year term by giving the district notice of his exercise of this option to renew.

At any time after the first fifteen (15) years of the term of any residential lease, the then present lessee may obtain from the district a new sixty-year lease on the terms and conditions contained in the then current lease form approved for use in residential leases with the exception of rent. Rent under such sixty-year leases will be payable on the same annual payment date as rent under the lease being renewed. The maximum annual rental under the new lease will be determined by the district as follows:

Renewal of Leases with Fixed Rental (non-escalating): The district will recompute the annual rental due under the lease being renewed as if the lease had contained annual rents at the fixed amount stated in the lease for the first ten-year period, escalating thereafter at ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest Five Dollars ($5.00), every five-year period. The annual rental which would have been payable as of the renewal date will be the annual rent payable for the first ten-year period of the renewed lease. Annual rental will escalate thereafter at ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest Five Dollars ($5.00), every five (5) years. Recomputed annual rental will be payable from and after the first day of the renewed lease term and not for the period prior to renewal.

Renewal of Leases with Escalating Rental: Annual rental will remain payable in accordance with the terms of the lease being renewed with rental continuing to escalate at ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest Five Dollars ($5.00), every five (5) years during the renewed term.

The district will charge a reasonable non-refundable fee for preparation of the renewal lease. The Lessee will be responsible for obtaining the consent of any mortgage holder to the lease modification.

At any time a lessee is found to be in default or in breach of the terms and conditions contained in the lease, the district shall give thirty (30) days written notice to such lessee before terminating the lease. Such notice shall be by certified mail and shall specifically state the default or breach. If the lessee does not cure the default or breach within thirty (30) days of such notice, then the district shall give written notice to the holder of any mortgage or deed of trust on the leasehold and such holder shall thereupon have thirty (30) days to cure the default or breach before the lease is terminated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 389, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1993).

§ 51-9-122.1.
Authority of board of directors to renegotiate nonresidential leases upon expiration.

Any holder of a lease that is not a residential lease subject to Section 51-9-122, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall have the right, exclusive of all other persons, to renew the lease at fair market value at any time prior to expiration of the lease.

Other than the right of a lessee to renew at fair market value, nothing in this section is intended to limit or restrict the right of the district to negotiate terms of any lease in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized by this section and in a manner deemed favorable to the district by the board of directors.

Prior to entering into any lease under this section, whether a new or renewal lease, the district shall obtain at least one (1) appraisal from a competent appraiser establishing the fair market rental value of the land, exclusive of improvements made by the leaseholder or any predecessor in title, and, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the land shall not be leased for an amount less than the fair market rental as determined by the appraiser and approved by the board. The district may require such other terms as it deems advisable. The cost of the appraisal shall be paid by the district and may be included in the costs of lease renewal to be reimbursed by the lessee.

The lessee may obtain an appraisal from a certified real estate appraiser establishing the fair market rental value of the land. If the fair market rental value of the land established in such appraisal differs from the fair market rental value of the land established in the appraisal obtained by the district, the land shall not be leased for an amount less than the average of the fair market rental value established by the two (2) appraisals.

For the purposes of this section, “terms” means rent, rent escalation clauses, rental adjustment periods and method of determination, term of years, permitted use, condition of improvements, removal of improvements, and compliance with district rules and regulations.

In the event a lessee has not obtained a new lease pursuant to the provisions of this section, any preemptive right of the lessee to lease the property shall be extinguished upon expiration of the lease, and, at the direction of the district, the lessee shall remove all improvements and other structures on the property immediately upon termination of the lease.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.